Arkansas, session 2025, HB1120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U014U APERS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE04
(2) A147C APERS DEP DIR OF INVEST AND FINANCE 1 GRADE SE01
(3) N254N APERS DEP DIR OF OPERATIONS 1 GRADE SE01
(4) U078U APERS DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(5) D148C APERS ASSOCI DIR OF INFORMATION TECHNO 1 GRADE IT11
(6) D015N APERS DIRECTOR OF INFORMATION TECHNO 1 GRADE IT10
*WFP009*
01/14/2025 8:27:44 AM WFP009

HB1120
(7) D006N STATE SYSTEMS ARCHITECT 1 GRADE IT10
(8) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(9) D044C SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(10) G042N APERS CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS14
(11) A003N SENIOR INVESTMENT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS14
(12) R003N APERS DIRECTOR OF BENEFITS ADMIN 2 GRADE GS13
(13) G037N APERS DIRECTOR OF OPERATIONS 1 GRADE GS13
(14) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 2 GRADE GS11
(15) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(16) R054C APERS BENEFITS OPERATIONS MGR 1 GRADE GS11
(17) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(18) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(19) A034C RETIREMENT SECTION MANAGER 3 GRADE GS09
(20) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 10 GRADE GS08
(21) A066C INTERNAL AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS08
(22) A062C RETIREMENT COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS08
(23) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(24) A079C INVESTMENT ANALYST 3 GRADE GS07
(25) A078C RETIREMENT COUNSELOR 15 GRADE GS07
(26) P031C MEDIA SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(27) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(28) A083C RETIREMENT ANALYST 9 GRADE GS06
(29) X115C SOCIAL SECURITY ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(30) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(31) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS05
(32) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 3 GRADE GS04
(33) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 78

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Arkansas
Public Employees Retirement System for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: six
(6) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.
01/14/2025 8:27:44 AM WFP009

HB1120
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement
System, to be payable from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas Public
Employees Retirement System for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,769,661
(02) EXTRA HELP 75,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,685,938
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,137,473
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 67,500
(C) PROF. FEES 2,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) BENEFITS-NON EMPLOYEE 40,000,000
(06) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 85,000,000
(07) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 7,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $142,735,572

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT - CASH. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System,
to be payable from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for
payment to beneficiaries by check or wire transfer, by the Arkansas Public
Employees Retirement System for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) BENEFITS $675,000,000
(02) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 50,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $725,000,000

01/14/2025 8:27:44 AM WFP009

HB1120
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATE POLICE RETIREMENT - OPERATIONS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System,
to be payable from the State Police Retirement Fund, for operating expenses
of the State Police Retirement System, by the Arkansas Public Employees
Retirement System for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $20,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 265,950
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) BENEFITS-NON EMPLOYEE 5,000,000
(03) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 25,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $30,285,950

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - STATE POLICE RETIREMENT - CASH. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System, to
be payable from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for payment
to beneficiaries of the State Police Retirement System by check or wire
transfer, by the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) BENEFITS $31,000,000
(02) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 1,500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $32,500,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - JUDICIAL RETIREMENT - OPERATIONS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System, to
be payable from the Judges Retirement Fund, for operating expenses of the
Judicial Retirement System, by the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement
System for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
01/14/2025 8:27:44 AM WFP009

HB1120

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $12,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 140,879
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) BENEFITS-NON EMPLOYEE 500,000
(03) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 8,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,652,879

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - JUDICIAL RETIREMENT - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System, to be
payable from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for payment to
beneficiaries of the Judicial Retirement System by check or wire transfer, by
the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) BENEFITS $20,750,000
(02) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 250,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $21,000,000

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. JUDICIAL
RETIREMENT FUND TRANSFERS. A sum not to exceed $150,000 in the 2024-2025
2025-2026 fiscal year may be transferred from the Judges Retirement Fund to
the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund for costs incurred by
the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System in administering the Judicial
Retirement System. Such transfer request shall be made to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, and upon his approval, said transfer shall be made on
his books and those of the Treasurer of the State and the Auditor of the
State.
01/14/2025 8:27:44 AM WFP009

HB1120
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. STATE
POLICE RETIREMENT FUND TRANSFERS. A sum not to exceed $250,000 in the 2024-
2025 2025-2026 fiscal year may be transferred from the State Police
Retirement Fund to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund for
costs incurred by the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System in
administering the State Police Retirement System. Such transfer request
shall be made to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and upon his
approval, said transfer shall be made on his books and those of the Treasurer
of the State and the Auditor of the State.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. EXEMPTION
FROM PRIOR REVIEW. The Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System is hereby
exempted from seeking prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee with regard to transfers between the Benefits and
Refund line items in the Public Employees Retirement Cash appropriation
section and the Benefits-Non Employee line item in the Public Employees
Retirement Operations appropriation section which are specifically related to
transfers necessitated by the changes in retirees' selection of the method of
payment of retirement benefits. All other provisions of Arkansas Code §19-4-
522 shall be applicable.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SPECIAL
STATE POLICE RETIREMENT FUND TRANSFERS. A sum not to exceed $50,000 may be
transferred from the State Police Retirement Fund to the Arkansas Public
Employees' Retirement System Fund to share in the costs incurred by the
Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System in the purchase and
01/14/2025 8:27:44 AM WFP009

HB1120
implementation of a new, and for the ongoing maintenance and operation of the
pension administration system, which will be is utilized to administer State
Police pension transactions for members and retirees. Said transfer shall
sunset at the end of fiscal year 2025 2026. Such transfer request shall be
made to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and upon his approval, said
transfer shall be made on his books and those of the Treasurer of the State
and the Auditor of the State.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 13. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SPECIAL
JUDICIAL RETIREMENT FUND TRANSFERS. A sum not to exceed $50,000 may be
transferred from the Judicial Retirement Fund to the Arkansas Public
Employees' Retirement System Fund to share in the costs incurred by the
Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System in the purchase and
implementation of a new, and for the ongoing maintenance and operation of the
pension administration system, which will be is utilized to administer
Judicial pension transactions for members and retirees. Said transfer shall
sunset at the end of fiscal year 2025 2026. Such transfer request shall be
made to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and upon his approval, said
transfer shall be made on his books and those of the Treasurer of State and
the Auditor of the State.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 14. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

01/14/2025 8:27:44 AM WFP009

HB1120
SECTION 15. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 16. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.
















01/14/2025 8:27:44 AM WFP009